New Jersey, session 221, S1037.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Secretary of Higher Education, in consultation with the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development and the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, shall establish the New Jersey STEM Entrepreneur Fellowship Program in county colleges and four-year institutions of higher education. b.    The secretary shall work in consultation with the New Jersey Economic Development Authority and the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development to fund no less than 20 fellowships, administered by the secretary, which focus on supporting entrepreneurs in the Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) fields. The fellowships may be provided to individuals who have proven to the secretary that they have an idea to create, advance or develop a product in the STEM field which will have a beneficial impact on society and will result in a self-sustaining business in the future. The fellowships shall be issued for three years each and shall be used primarily to support the entrepreneurs in commercializing the idea and developing a well-structured business. Priority shall be given to fellowships which are submitted with the support of an incubator supported by the State of New Jersey or any of its public entities. c.     The secretary, in consultation with the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, shall conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the New Jersey STEM Entrepreneur Fellowship Program to establish new businesses no later than five years after the approval of the first fellowship. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.